Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4189.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1051. (1) The bridge on South Grand Avenue over highway I-96 in the village of Fowlerville shall be known as the "âLCpl Michael W. Hanks Memorial Bridge"â. (2) Subject to section 2, a sign designating the location of the "âLCpl Michael W. Hanks Memorial Bridge"â must be placed at the approach of the bridge on highway I-96. (3) The state transportation department shall coordinate with the Livingston County road commission in placing an appropriate sign designating the location of the "âLCpl Michael W. Hanks Memorial Bridge"â at each approach of the bridge on South Grand Avenue. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor